Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-202.01
Amendments proposed by Legislature; explanatory statement; requirements.

(1) When any proposal submitted by the Legislature is placed on the ballot for a vote of the electorate of the entire state, a statement in clear, concise language explaining the effect of a vote for and a vote against the proposal shall be printed immediately preceding the ballot title. Such statement shall be prepared by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council and submitted to the Secretary of State at least four months prior to the general election for certification to the election commissioners and county clerks along with the ballot titles. Such statement shall be printed in italics and shall be so worded as to not be intentionally an argument or likely to create prejudice either for or against the proposal. The statement shall also be published in italics preceding the ballot title on each proposal published pursuant to section 49-202.

(2) The four-month requirement prescribed in subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to any legislative proposal submitted to the electorate at a special election as provided in Article XVI, section 1, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 559.